test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-3lex_putestid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - navaliđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    navaliđ+V+Inf: naˊṿaliđ
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naˊṿalâm
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: naˊṿalah
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: navvaal
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: naˊṿaleen
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: navvaalvettee
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: naˊṿalává
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: naˊṿalep
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: navvaalvetteđ
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: naˊṿaleh
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: naˊṿalim
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: naˊṿalih
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: naˊṿalij
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [naˊṿaláim, naˊṿalááim]
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [naˊṿaláid, naˊṿalááid]
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [naˊṿaláin, naˊṿalááin]
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: naˊṿalijm
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: naˊṿalijd
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: naˊṿalii
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Sg1: naˊṿaliččim
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Sg2: naˊṿaliččih
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Sg3: naˊṿaličij
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Du1: [naˊṿaliččijm, naˊṿaliččiijm]
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Du2: [naˊṿaliččijd, naˊṿaliččiijd]
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Du3: [naˊṿaliččijn, naˊṿaliččiijn]
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Pl1: naˊṿaliččijm
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: naˊṿaliččijd
    navaliđ+V+Cond+Pl3: naˊṿaliččii
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Sg1: naˊṿaližžeem
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Sg2: naˊṿaližžeeh
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Sg3: naˊṿališ
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Du1: naˊṿaližžeen
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Du2: naˊṿališvettee
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Du3: naˊṿaližává
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Pl1: naˊṿaližžep
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Pl2: naˊṿališvetted
    navaliđ+V+Pot+Pl3: naˊṿaližeh
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: naˊṿalum
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: navvaal
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: naˊṿalus
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: naˊṿaloon
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: naˊṿalee
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: naˊṿalus
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: naˊṿalop
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: naˊṿaliđ
    navaliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: naˊṿalus
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: navvaal
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: naˊṿalâm
    navaliđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: naṿaliččii  
    navaliđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: naṿaližžii
    navaliđ+V+PrsPrc: [naṿaleijee, naṿalijjee]
    navaliđ+V+PrfPrc: naṿalâm
    navaliđ+V+Actio: naṿalem
    navaliđ+V+Actio+Ess: navvaalmin
    navaliđ+V+Actio+Loc: navvaalmist
    navaliđ+V+Actio+Ill: navvaalmân
    navaliđ+V+Ger: navvaaldijn
    navaliđ+V+VAbess: navvaaalhánnáá

  Verb - putásmiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    putásmiđ+V+Inf: puˊtásmiđ
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puˊtásmâm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: puˊtásmah
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puttáásm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: puˊtásmeen
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: puttáásmvettee
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: puˊtásmává
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: puˊtásmep
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: puttáásmvetteđ
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puˊtásmeh
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puˊtásmim
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: puˊtásmih
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puˊtásmij
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [puˊtásmáim, puˊtásmááim]
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [puˊtásmáid, puˊtásmááid]
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [puˊtásmáin, puˊtásmááin]
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: puˊtásmijm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: puˊtásmijd
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puˊtásmii
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: puˊtásmiččim
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: puˊtásmiččih
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: puˊtásmičij
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [puˊtásmiččijm, puˊtásmiččiijm]
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [puˊtásmiččijd, puˊtásmiččiijd]
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [puˊtásmiččijn, puˊtásmiččiijn]
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: puˊtásmiččijm
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: puˊtásmiččijd
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: puˊtásmiččii
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: puˊtásmižžeem
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: puˊtásmižžeeh
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: puˊtásmiš
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Du1: puˊtásmižžeen
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Du2: puˊtásmišvettee
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Du3: puˊtásmižává
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: puˊtásmižžep
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: puˊtásmišvetted
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: puˊtásmižeh
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: puˊtásmum
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: puttáásm
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: puˊtásmus
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: puˊtásmoon
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: puˊtásmee
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: puˊtásmus
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: puˊtásmop
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: puˊtásmiđ
    putásmiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: puˊtásmus
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puttáásm
    putásmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: puˊtásmâm
    putásmiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: puˊtásmiččii
    putásmiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: puˊtásmižžii
    putásmiđ+V+PrsPrc: [puˊtásmeijee, puˊtásmijjee]
    putásmiđ+V+PrfPrc: puˊtásmâm
    putásmiđ+V+Actio: puˊtásmem
    putásmiđ+V+Actio+Ess: puttáásmmin
    putásmiđ+V+Actio+Loc: puttáásmmist
    putásmiđ+V+Actio+Ill: puttáásmmân
    putásmiđ+V+Ger: puttáásmdijn
    putásmiđ+V+VAbess: puttáásmhánnáá


  Verb - lasettiđ: # MLO, checked; this should probably be in another yaml but I will leave it here first for a while. Check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill 
    lasettiđ+V+Inf: laˊsettiđ
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laˊsettâm
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: laˊsettah
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lasseet
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: laˊsetteen
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: lasseetvettee
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: laˊsettává
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lasˊettep
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lasseetvetteđ
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: laˊsetteh
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: laˊsettim
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: laˊsettih
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: laˊsettij
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [laˊsettáim, lasˊettááim]
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [laˊsettáid, lasˊettááid]
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [laˊsettáin, laˊsettááin]
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: laˊsettijm
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: laˊsettijd
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laˊsettii
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: laˊsettiččim
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: laˊsettiččih
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: laˊsettičij
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [laˊsettiččijm, laˊsettiččiijm]
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [laˊsettiččijd, laˊsettiččiijd]
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [laˊsettiččijn, laˊsettiččiijn]
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: laˊsettiččijm
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: laˊsettiččijd
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: laˊsettiččii
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: laˊsettižžeem
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: laˊsettižžeeh
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: laˊsettiš
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Du1: laˊsettižžeen
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Du2: laˊsettišvettee
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Du3: laˊsettižává
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: laˊsettižžep
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: laˊsettišvetted
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: laˊsettižeh
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: laˊsettum
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: lasseet
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: laˊsettus
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: laˊsettoon
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: laˊsettee
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: laˊsettus
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: laˊsettop
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: laˊsettiđ
    lasettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: laˊsettus
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: laaseet      #lasseet?
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: laˊsettâm
    lasettiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: laˊsettiččii 
    lasettiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: laˊsettižžii
    lasettiđ+V+PrsPrc: laˊsettiee
    lasettiđ+V+PrfPrc: lˊasettâm
    lasettiđ+V+Actio: laˊsettem
    lasettiđ+V+Actio+Ess: lasseetmin
    lasettiđ+V+Actio+Loc: lasseetmist
    lasettiđ+V+Actio+Ill: lasseetmân
    lasettiđ+V+Ger: lasseetdijn
    lasettiđ+V+VAbess: laaseethánnáá
